South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3430.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 11-7-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-10. The State Fiscal Accountability Authority shall select the State Auditor, who shall select necessary assistants in conformity with the appropriations for the office. (A) There is established the Department of Governmental Auditing headed by the State Auditor.  The State Auditor must be selected without regard to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity, capability for strong leadership, and demonstrated ability in accounting, auditing, financial analysis, law, management analysis, public administration, investigation, criminal justice administration, or other closely related fields. (B) The State Auditor shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate for a term of six years. The State Auditor's term shall commence on July first of the appointing year and expire on June thirtieth of the ending year. The State Auditor may be removed from office pursuant to Section 1-3-240(C). The Governor may reappoint the State Auditor for additional terms. The State Auditor may serve in a holdover capacity for a maximum of seven months past the expiration of their term. (C) The State Auditor's annual compensation shall be set by the Agency Head Salary Commission and shall not be reduced during their term of office. The State Auditor shall receive compensation as established under the provisions of Section 8-11-160 and for which funds have been authorized in the general appropriations act. (D) The State Auditor shall employ a staff comprised of deputy auditors, accountants, and other professional staff necessary to carry out the duties of the department as authorized by law.  The deputy auditors and all employees of the department who report directly to a deputy auditor serve at will and may be removed by the State Auditor. The Department of Administration's Division of State Human Resources, in consultation with the State Auditor, shall establish appropriate classifications or unclassified position titles within each position category along with a salary range commensurate with the level of responsibility and duties of the position for the deputy auditors and all employees of the Department of Governmental Auditing who report directly to a deputy auditor. The State Auditor shall fix the salaries of all staff subject to the funds authorized in the annual appropriations act and in accordance with the position categories established pursuant to this paragraph of the state's existing uniform classification and compensation plan as is appropriate. Deputy auditors and all employees of the Department of Governmental Auditing who report directly to a deputy auditor shall not be subject to the limitations of Section 8-11-165(B). The State Auditor shall provide requisite training and professional development pursuant to Section 8-15-60. All classified or unclassified personnel employed by the divisions, programs, services, or initiatives of the Office of the State Auditor, either by contract or by employment at will, become on the effective date of the act, employees of the Department of Governmental Auditing, with the same compensation, classification, and grade level, as applicable, subject to and until such time as the State Auditor acts to employ the staff and fix the salaries as provided for in this section. (E) The Department of Administration shall provide administrative support to the Department of Governmental Auditing for the performance of its duties including, but not limited to, information technology, shared services support, and logistical support. In a manner to be determined by the Department of Administration, the Department of Governmental Auditing shall reimburse the Department of Administration for personnel and operating expenses relating to the provision of administrative support pursuant to this section. SECTION 2.  Section 11-7-20 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-20. (A) All state agencies and entities supported partially or entirely by public funds are subject to audit by or under the oversight of the State Auditor, except as otherwise specifically provided by law. The State Auditor, to the extent practicable and consistent with his overall responsibility, shall audit or cause to be audited each state agency and entity annually. These audits shall be made to assist in furnishing for the purpose of providing the General Assembly, the Governor, the executive departments and agencies of the State, the governing bodies and executive departments of the political subdivisions of the State, all state entities, and the public with an independent evaluation of whether public funds are managed according to the applicable financial reporting framework and may include an independent evaluation of public program performance. (B) Annually the State Auditor shall audit or cause to be audited the state's basic financial statements prepared by the Comptroller General of South Carolina. (C) The State Auditor shall examine as often the State Auditor deems appropriate the accounts kept by the State Treasurer, and if the auditor discovers any irregularity or deficiency in the accounts, unless the irregularity or deficiency is rectified or explained to the State Auditor's satisfaction, report it in writing to the General Assembly and provide a copy of the report to the Governor and Attorney General. In addition to regular audits, the State Auditor shall audit the State Treasurer's records at the time a new State Treasurer assumes office and the State Treasurer shall assume responsibility for the balances in the accounts, as determined by the audit. The State Auditor shall audit the State Treasurer's records at the end of the State Treasurer's term of office or at the time the State Treasurer leaves office to determine that the accounts are in order. (D) The State Auditor may examine the accounts and records of any bank or financial institution relating to transactions with the State Treasurer, or with any state agency. The State Auditor may require banks or financial institutions doing business with the State to provide the State Auditor information relating to transactions with the State Treasurer or any state agency. (E)   The State Auditor shall provide a report to the Governor and Attorney General, and other appropriate officials, of facts in the State Auditor's possession that pertain to the apparent violation of criminal statutes or apparent instances of malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance by an officer or employee. In the event the State Auditor identifies instances of fraud, waste, and abuse during any state agency audit, the State Auditor shall refer such instances to the State Inspector General for examination. If the Governor or Attorney General is the subject of the report, the report shall be made to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House, the Office of the Inspector General, and other appropriate officials. (C) (F) Annually the State Auditor shall audit or cause to be audited the compliance of the State of South Carolina with the U. S. Office of Management and Budget (OMB) Circular A-133 Compliance Supplement Title 2 U.S. Code of Federal Regulations Part 200, Uniform Administrative Requirements, Cost Principles, and Audit Requirements for Federal Awards (Uniform Guidance) or its successor as applicable to major federal programs. (D) (G) Audits must be conducted in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America; the standards applicable to financial audits contained in Government Auditing Standards, issued by the Comptroller General of the United States; and OMB Circular A-133, the Uniform Guidance, Audits of States, Local Governments, and Nonprofit Organizations, or its successor. (H) The State Auditor shall, in the reports of audits, make any comments, suggestions, or recommendations the auditor deems appropriate concerning any aspect of the state agency's activities and operations. (I) The State Auditor shall cooperate, act, and function with other audit or evaluation organizations in the State, with appropriate councils or committees of other states, with governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the State, and with federal agencies in an effort to maximize the extent of intergovernmental audit coordination and thereby avoid unnecessary duplication and expense of audit effort. Nothing in this section shall be construed to give the State Auditor control over the internal auditors of any agency, except those statutorily required in Section 57-1-360. SECTION 3.  Section 11-7-25 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-25. Division of Local Government Services (A) The department shall include a Division of Local Government Services headed by a deputy auditor. (B) The division To the extent practicable and consistent with his overall responsibility, the State Auditor periodically shall periodically audit or cause to be audited the financial records of the county treasurers, municipal treasurers, county clerks of court, magistrates, and municipal courts to report if whether fines and assessments imposed pursuant to Sections 14-1-205 through 14-1-208 are collected properly and remitted to the State Treasurer. (C) Upon the issuance of an audit report, the State Auditor immediately shall notify the State Treasurer, Division of Court Administration, and the chief administrator of the affected agency, department, county, or municipality. Such audit reports shall also be made available to the State Inspector General pursuant to Section 1-6-50 and to the Legislative Audit Council pursuant to Section 2-15-50. (D) The Division of Local Government Services may use funds appropriated to the department for innovative audit, accounting, or local government assistance services that improve the quality or increase the range of services offered to local governments to accomplish accurate, efficient, and transparent financial reporting. SECTION 4.  Section 11-7-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-30. Reports of audit findings must be available to the Governor, State Fiscal Accountability Authority, General Assembly, and the general public. The State Auditor shall notify the Governor, the General Assembly, and the State Fiscal Accountability Authority immediately upon the issuance of an audit report. Such audit reports shall also be made available to the State Inspector General pursuant to Section 1-6-50 and to the Legislative Audit Council pursuant to Section 2-15-50. SECTION 5.  Section 11-7-55 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-55. The State Auditor may obtain the services of independent public accountants as he considers necessary to carry out his duties and responsibilities. The State Auditor may use funds appropriated for personal services to contract with private firms, using a request for proposals, to perform audits. Notwithstanding this section, the State Auditor maintains sole responsibility for the audit of the state's Annual Comprehensive Financial Report prepared by the Comptroller General's Office. SECTION 6.  Section 11-7-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-7-60. (A) Each State agency shall remit to the State Auditor an amount representing an equitable portion of the expense of contracting with a certified public accounting firm to conduct a portion of the audit of the state's Comprehensive Annual Financial Report Annual Comprehensive Financial Report prepared by the Comptroller General's Office. Each state agency's equitable portion of the expense must be determined by a schedule developed by the State Auditor.  The remittance must be based upon invoices provided by the State Auditor upon completion of the annual audit. The audit must be rebid using a request for proposals no less frequently than every five years. (B) The auditor shall, through appropriate tests, satisfy himself or herself concerning the propriety of the data presented in the Annual Comprehensive Financial Report and shall express the appropriate auditor's opinion in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. SECTION 7.  Section 1-3-240(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C)(1) Persons appointed to the following offices of the State may be removed by the Governor for malfeasance, misfeasance, incompetency, absenteeism, conflicts of interest, misconduct, persistent neglect of duty in office, or incapacity: (a) Workers' Compensation Commission; (b) [Reserved] State Auditor; (c) Ethics Commission; (d) Election Commission; (e) Professional and Occupational Licensing Boards; (f) Juvenile Parole Board; (g) Probation, Parole and Pardon Board; (h) Director of the Department of Public Safety; (i) Board of the Department of Health and Environmental Control, excepting the chairman; (j) Chief of State Law Enforcement Division; (k) South Carolina Lottery Commission; (l) Executive Director of the Office of Regulatory Staff; (m) Directors of the South Carolina Public Service Authority appointed pursuant to Section 58-31-20; (n) State Ports Authority; (o) State Inspector General; (p) State Adjutant General; (q) South Carolina Retirement Investment Commission members appointed by the Governor or members of the General Assembly; and (r) South Carolina Public Benefit Authority members. (2) Upon the expiration of an officeholder's term, the individual may continue to serve until a successor is appointed and qualifies. SECTION 8.  On the effective date of this act, the interim State Auditor selected by the State Fiscal Accountability Authority shall continue in office in a holdover capacity until the Governor appoints a State Auditor as provided in this act. The interim State Auditor serving in holdover capacity shall be eligible for appointment by the Governor. A vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as appointment. SECTION 9.  Section 1-11-20(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) The State Auditor is transferred to, and incorporated into, the State Fiscal Accountability Authority. [Reserved] SECTION 10.    Section 4-9-150 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 4-9-150. The council shall provide for an independent annual audit of all financial records and transactions of the county and any agency funded in whole by county funds and may provide for more frequent audits as it considers necessary.  Special audits may be provided for any agency receiving county funds as the county governing body considers necessary. The audits must be made by a certified public accountant or public accountant or firm of these accountants who have no personal interest, direct or indirect, in the fiscal affairs of the county government or any of its officers. The council may, without requiring competitive bids, designate the accountant or firm annually or for a period not exceeding three years. The designation for any particular fiscal year must be made no later than thirty days after the beginning of the fiscal year. The report of the audit must be made available for public inspection. A copy of the report of the audit must be submitted to the State Treasurer Department of Governmental Auditing no later than January first each year following the close of the books of the previous fiscal year. Upon a showing of proper cause, as determined by the State Treasurer department, the State Treasurerdepartment shall grant a county an extension of ninety days. To be considered, a request for extension must be signed by the chair of the council before the deadline for filing. If the report is not filed with the State Treasurer department by January first, or within the time extended for filing the report, the department shall notify funds distributed by the State Treasurer to withhold funds to the county in the current fiscal year must be withheld pending receipt of a copy of the report. The department shall post these audits in a conspicuous place on its website. SECTION 11. Section 5-7-240(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The audit or compilation must be performed by an independent certified public accountant or a firm of certified public accountants. The report of the audit or compilation shall be made available for public inspection, and a copy must be provided to the Department of Governmental Auditing. Financial statements of municipalities with a court system must include the requirements of Section 14-1-208. The department shall post these audits and compilations of financial statements in a conspicuous place on its website. A municipality that exceeds the threshold in the current fiscal year but was below the threshold in the previous fiscal year must begin submitting audited financial statements annually beginning no later than the fiscal year following the year in which its total revenues exceed the threshold. SECTION 12.    Section 14-1-208(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) To ensure that fines and assessments imposed pursuant to this section and Section 14-1-209(A) are properly collected and remitted to the State Treasurer, the audit or compilation performed for each municipality pursuant to Section 5-7-240 must include a Uniform Supplemental Schedule Form detailing all fines and assessments collected at the court level, the amount remitted to the municipal treasurer, and the amount remitted to the State Treasurer. (1) To the extent that records are made available in the format determined pursuant to subsection (E)(4), the Uniform Supplemental Schedule Form developed by the Office of the Attorney General, South Carolina Crime Victim Services Division, must be used by all counties and municipalities to report their crime victim services funds and must include the following elements: (a) all fines collected by the clerk of court for the municipal court; (b) all assessments collected by the clerk of court for the municipal court; (c) the amount of fines retained by the municipal treasurer; (d) the amount of assessments retained by the municipal treasurer; (e) the amount of fines and assessments remitted to the State Treasurer pursuant to this section; and (f) the total funds, by source, allocated to victim services activities, how those funds were expended, and any balances carried forward. (2) For municipalities required to provide for an annual audit of financial statements pursuant to Section 5-7-240, the Uniform Supplemental Schedule Form must be included in the external auditor's report as required by generally accepted auditing standards when information accompanies the basic financial statements in auditor submitted documents. (3) For municipalities allowed to provide for a compilation of financial statements pursuant to Section 5-7-240, the Uniform Supplement Schedule Form must be included in the compilation report as supplemental information. In addition, the municipality is required to engage the external accountant to perform agreed upon procedures related to the supplemental schedule as established annually by the Office of the State Treasurer and approved by the Office of the State Auditor. (4) Within thirty days of issuance of the audited or compiled financial statement, the municipality must submit to the State Treasurer Department of Governmental Auditing a copy of the audited or compiled financial statement and a statement of the actual cost associated with the preparation of the Uniform Supplemental Schedule Form required in this section and, if applicable, the agreed upon procedures. Upon submission to the State Treasurer department, the municipality may retain and pay from the fines and assessments collected pursuant to this section the actual expense charged by the external auditor or accountant associated with the Uniform Supplemental Schedule Form required in this subsection, not to exceed two thousand dollars each year. (5) The clerk of court and municipal treasurer shall keep records of fines and assessments required to be reviewed pursuant to this subsection in the format determined by the municipal governing body and make those records available for review. SECTION 13. Section 38-90-20(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A captive insurance company, when permitted by its articles of incorporation, articles of organization, operating agreement, or charter, may apply to the director for a license to provide any and all insurance, except workers' compensation insurance written on a direct basis, authorized by this title; including, without limitation, liquor liability insurance; however: (1) a pure captive insurance company may not insure any risks other than those of its parent, affiliated companies, controlled unaffiliated business, risks assumed from a risk pool for the purpose of risk sharing, or a combination of them; (2) an association captive insurance company may not insure any risks other than those of the member organizations of its association and their affiliated companies; (3) an industrial insured captive insurance company may not insure any risks other than those of the industrial insureds that comprise the industrial insured group and their affiliated companies; (4) a special purpose captive insurance company may provide insurance or reinsurance, or both, for risks as approved by the director; (5) a captive insurance company may not provide personal motor vehicle or homeowner's insurance coverage written on a direct basis; (6) a captive insurance company may not accept or cede reinsurance except as provided in Section 38-90-110. (7) a captive insurance company may not issue eroding or declining insurance coverage whereby the occurrence or aggregate limits are reduced by costs or expenses arising from the insurance company's duty to defend a claim. SECTION 14. Section 61-2-60 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (9) regulations governing the development, implementation, education, and enforcement of responsible alcohol server training positions. SECTION 15. Section 61-2-145 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 61-2-145.  (A) In addition to all other requirements, a person licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, which remains open after five o'clock p.m. to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, is required to maintain a liquor liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance policy with a liquor liability endorsement for a total coveragewith an annual aggregate limit of at least one million dollars during the period of the biennial permit or license, unless the person licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic beverages qualifies under the terms of a liquor liability risk mitigation program pursuant to subsection (E). Failure to maintain this coverage during the period of the biennial permit or license constitutes grounds for suspension or revocation of the permit or license and is sufficient grounds for the department to seek an emergency revocation order as provided in Sections 12-60-1340 and 1-23-370(c). An insurance policy issued pursuant to this section must provide for minimum coverage of at least fifty percent of the total aggregate limit, per occurrence, given rise to the claim. (B) The department shall add this requirement to all applications and renewals for biennial permits or licenses to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, in which the permittees and licensees remain open and sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption after five o'clock p.m. Each applicant or person renewing its license or permit, to whom this requirement applies, shall provide the department with documentation of a liquor liability insurance policy or a general liability insurance policy with a liquor liability endorsement in the required amounts. (C) Each insurer writing liquor liability insurance policies or general liability insurance policies with a liquor liability endorsement to a person licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, in which the person so licensed or permitted remains open to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption after five o'clock p.m., must notify the department in a manner prescribed by department regulation of the lapse or termination of the liquor liability insurance policy or the general liability insurance policy with a liquor liability endorsement within thirty days of the lapse or termination. (D) For the purposes of this section, the term "alcoholic beverages" means beer, wine, alcoholic liquors, and alcoholic liquor by the drink as defined in Chapter 4, Title 61, and Chapter 6, Title 61. (E) A person licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, which remains open after five o'clock p.m. to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, may qualify for liquor liability risk mitigation. A person qualifies if the person and the entity for which the person obtained the license or permit: (1) stop serving alcohol by twelve o'clock a.m. A person meeting the requirements of this item may reduce the required annual aggregate limit by one hundred thousand dollars, and an additional one hundred thousand dollars for each hour earlier until six o'clock p.m.; (2) complete an alcohol server training course pursuant to Title 61, Chapter 3; (3) have less than forty percent of its total sales deriving from alcohol sales; or (4) are a nonprofit organization which is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c) of Title 26 of United States Code, as amended, or the entity is engaging in a single event for which a Beer and Wine Special Event License or Liquor Special Event Permit is obtained. (5) A person meeting the requirement of item (2) or (3) may reduce the required annual aggregate limit by one hundred thousand dollars each. An entity meeting the requirements of item (4) may reduce the annual aggregate limit by five hundred thousand dollars. A person complying with any combination of items (1)-(4) must receive the permitted reduction in the required annual aggregate limit for each item the entity complies with provided a person licensed or permitted to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, which remains open after five o'clock p.m. to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption, must at all times maintain coverage with an annual aggregate limit of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars during the period of the biennial permit or license. (6) Insurers must establish liquor liability mitigation measures and offer premium discounts for compliance therewith that reduce the risk to the general public associated with the service of on-premises consumption of alcohol. (F) For purposes of this section, the calculation of total sales shall include sales of alcohol sold for on-premises consumption and all food and nonalcoholic beverages sold on the premises where the alcohol is sold, including food and nonalcoholic beverages sold by third-party vendors. SECTION 16. Title 61 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: CHAPTER 3 Alcohol Server Training Section 61-3-100.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: (1) "Alcohol" means beer, wine, alcoholic liquors, or any other type of alcoholic beverage that contains any amount of alcohol and is used as a beverage for human consumption. (2) "Alcohol server" means an individual who sells, serves, transfers, or dispenses alcohol for on-premises consumption at permitted or licensed premises and may include a permittee, licensee, manager, or other employee of a permittee or licensee. "Alcohol server" does not include an individual employed or volunteering on a temporary basis for a one-time special event, such as a banquet, or at an event that has a temporary permit to sell beer, wine, or alcoholic liquors by the drink and does not include an individual transferring alcohol from one location to another as a distributor, wholesaler, or as otherwise lawfully authorized to transfer alcohol from one location to another by this title; and does not include an individual who cannot lawfully serve or deliver alcohol pursuant to Sections 61-4-90(D) and 61-6-2200. (3) "Alcohol server certificate" means an authorization issued by the department for an individual to be employed or engaged as an alcohol server for on-premises consumption. (4) "DAODAS" means the South Carolina Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services. (5) "Department" means the South Carolina Department of Revenue. (6) "Division" means the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division. (7) "Employee" means a person who is employed  by a permittee or a licensee. (8) "Licensee" means a person issued a license by the department pursuant to Title 61 to sell, serve, transfer, or dispense alcoholic liquors or alcoholic liquor by the drink for on-premises consumption. (9) "Manager" means an individual employed by a permittee or licensee who manages, directs, or controls the sale, service, transfer, or dispensing of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption at the permitted or licensed premises. (10) "Permittee" means a person issued a permit by the department pursuant to Title 61 to sell, serve, transfer, or dispense beer, wine, ale, porter, or other malted beverages for on-premises consumption. (11) "Program" means an alcohol server training and education course and examination approved by the department with input from DAODAS and the division that is administered by authorized providers. (12) "Provider" means an individual, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity authorized by the department that offers and administers a program. Section 61-3-110.  (A) An entity may not qualify for the liquor liability mitigation program pursuant to Section 61-2-145(E)(2) unless all employees who are employed as an alcohol server or a manager on permitted or licensed premises obtain, within sixty calendar days of employment, an alcohol server certificate pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. If a permittee or licensee functions or is employed as an alcohol server or manager on the permitted or licensed premises, then the permittee or licensee must also complete training on responsible alcohol server training and obtain an alcohol server certificate pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. An alcohol server shall not consume alcohol or be mentally or physically impaired by alcohol, drugs, or controlled substances while serving alcohol. (B) Each permittee or licensee shall maintain at all times on its permitted or licensed premises copies of the alcohol server certificates of the permittee or licensee, if applicable, and the alcohol server certificates of each manager and each alcohol server then employed by the permittee or licensee. Copies of the alcohol server certificate must be made available, upon request, to the department, the division, or the agents and employees of each. For the purposes of enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, a permittee or licensee must also make available to the department or the division, when requested, the hire date of an alcohol server. (C) Failure to produce a copy of an alcohol server certificate when an alcohol server has been employed for sixty calendar days subjects the permittee or licensee to noncompliance with Section 61-2-145(E). Section 61-3-120.  (A)(1) The department, in collaboration with DAODAS and the division, is authorized to approve alcohol server training programs, based on best-evidence practice standards, offered by providers. A program that has not received approval within sixty days from submission shall be considered denied. A provider may appeal denial pursuant to Section 61-2-260 and the South Carolina Administrative Procedures Act. (2) A provider must provide alcohol server training programs to all applicable individuals free of charge. (B) The curricula of each program must include the following subjects: (1) state laws and regulations pertaining to: (a) the sale and service of alcoholic beverages; (b) the permitting and licensing of sellers of alcoholic beverages; (c) impaired driving or driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs; (d) liquor liability issues; (e) the carrying of concealed weapons by authorized permit holders into businesses selling and serving alcoholic beverages; and (f) life consequences, such as the loss of education scholarships, to minors relating to the unlawful use, transfer, or sale of alcoholic beverages; (2) the effect that alcohol has on the body and human behavior including, but not limited to, its effect on an individual's ability to operate a motor vehicle when intoxicated; (3) information on blood alcohol concentration and factors that change or alter blood alcohol concentration; (4) the effect that alcohol has on an individual when taken in combination with commonly used prescription or nonprescription drugs or with illegal drugs; (5) information on recognizing the signs of intoxication and methods for preventing intoxication; (6) methods of recognizing problem drinkers and techniques for intervening with and refusing to serve problem drinkers; (7) methods of identifying and refusing to serve or sell alcoholic beverages to individuals under twenty-one years of age and intoxicated individuals; (8) methods for properly and effectively checking the identification of an individual, for identifying illegal identification, and for handling situations involving individuals who have provided illegal identification; (9) South Carolina law enforcement information; and (10) other topics related to alcohol server education and training designated by the department, in collaboration with DAODAS and the division, to be included. (C) The department shall approve only online-designed training programs that meet each of the following criteria: (1) a program must cover the content specified in subsection (B); (2) the content in a program must clearly identify and focus on the knowledge, skills, and abilities needed to responsibly serve alcoholic beverages and must be developed using best practices in instructional design and exam development to ensure that the program is fair and legally defensible; (3) a program shall be offered online; (4) online training must be at least four hours, be available in English and Spanish, and include a test; (5) online or computer-based training programs must use linear navigation that requires the completion of a module before the course proceeds to the next module, with no content omitted; be interactive; have audio for content; and include a test; (6) training and testing must be conducted online. All tests must be monitored by an online proctor. A passing grade for a test, as provided by the program, is required; and (7) training certificates are issued by the provider only after training is complete and a test has been passed successfully. Within ten business days after a training is completed, each provider must give to the department a report of all individuals who have successfully completed the training and testing. The provider must also maintain these records for at least five years following the end of the training program for purposes of verifying certification validity by the department or the division. (D) The department, in collaboration with DAODAS and the division, may suspend or revoke the authorization of a provider that the department determines has violated the provisions of this chapter. If a provider's authorization is suspended or revoked, then that provider must cease operations in this State immediately and refund any money paid to it by individuals enrolled in that provider's program at the time of the suspension or revocation. Section 61-3-130.  (A) The provider of a program that is authorized by the department must pay a fee, in an amount to be determined by the department, not to exceed five hundred dollars per year, renewable each year. State agency providers are exempt from payment. Each fee shall be deposited into the Responsible Alcohol Server Training Fund to assist with the costs associated with implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. (B) The Responsible Alcohol Server Training Fund is a revolving fund, and no funds deposited therein shall revert to the general fund of the state treasury. (C) On or before the second Tuesday of each year, the department, with the assistance of the division, must make a report of all income and expenditures made from the Responsible Alcohol Server Training Fund as of December thirty-first of the previous year. A copy of the report shall be given to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of the Senate; posted on the websites of the department and the division; and recorded in the journals of each body of the General Assembly at the beginning of each legislative year. Section 61-3-140.  (A)(1) The department must issue an alcohol server certificate to each applicant who completes an approved program or a recertification program and who provides other information as may be required by the department in an application form that is available on the department's website. A person must apply for an alcohol server certificate within six months of completing a program. The department, if circumstances warrant the issuance of a temporary alcohol server certificate, may issue a temporary alcohol server certificate that is valid for a period of no more than thirty calendar days. (2) The department, in collaboration with DAODAS and the division, may issue an alcohol server certificate to an individual from outside of the State who applies for an alcohol server certificate if the individual has an alcohol server certificate from a nationally recognized or comparable, state-recognized alcohol server certification program that the department, DAODAS, and the division find meets or exceeds the programs offered in this State. (B) Alcohol server certificates shall not be issued to graduates of programs that are not approved by the department. (C) An alcohol server certificate is the property of the individual to whom it is issued and is transferrable among employers. (D) Alcohol server certificates are valid for a period of five years from the date that the alcohol server certificate was issued. After the five-year period, a new or recertified alcohol server certificate must be obtained pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. (E) Upon expiration of an alcohol server certificate, the individual to whom the alcohol server certificate was issued may obtain recertification in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department and approved by the General Assembly. (F) The department must issue and renew alcohol server certificates for all qualifying applicants free of charge. (G) An applicant must be deemed to be a qualifying applicant for the purpose of alcohol server certificate issuance and renewal if they have successfully completed all training and testing requirements as found in Section 61-3-120. Section 61-3-150.  As a requirement for application or renewal of a permit or license for on-premises consumption under Chapter 4, Title 61 or Chapter 6, Title 61, a permittee or licensee for on-premises consumption seeking to utilize Section 61-2-145(E) must submit to the department proof that the permittee or licensee, if applicable, and each manager and alcohol server employed by the permittee or licensee during the upcoming or prior permit or license period have or have held valid alcohol server certificates at all times that alcoholic beverages were sold, served, or dispensed. Section 61-3-160.  The division and the department are responsible for enforcement of the provisions of this chapter. The department is responsible for bringing administrative actions for violations of the provisions of this chapter or related regulations, and those actions shall proceed according to the provisions of Section 61-2-260 and the South Carolina Administrative Procedures Act. SECTION 17. Section 61-6-2220 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 61-6-2220. A person or establishment licensed to sell alcoholic liquors or liquor by the drink pursuant to this article may not knowingly sell these beverages to persons in an intoxicated condition; these sales are considered violations of the provisions thereof and subject to the penalties contained herein. SECTION 18. Section 15-38-15(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) This section does not apply to a defendant whose conduct is determined to be wilful, wanton, reckless, grossly negligent, or intentional or conduct involving the use, sale, or possession of alcohol or the illegal or illicit use, sale, or possession of drugs. SECTION 19. Section 56-5-2930 (C) and (H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The fine for a first offense must not be suspended. The court is prohibited from suspending a monetary fine below that of the next preceding minimum monetary fine. If the trier of fact determines that the person convicted under the provisions of this section did any act forbidden by law or neglected any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately caused a collision that occurred while the person was driving in violation of this section, the court may impose an additional sentence of a fine of not more than four hundred dollars or an additional period of imprisonment of not more than thirty days. However, in lieu of the thirty-day imprisonment, the court may provide for forty-eight hours of public service employment. The public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions the court considers proper. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 23-3-540, 22-3-550, and 14-25-65, this additional sentence may be imposed by the magistrate or municipal court for any offense for which the court would otherwise have jurisdiction. (H) A person convicted of violating this section, whether for a first offense or subsequent offense, must enroll in and successfully complete an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program certified by the Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services and participate in and complete a DUI victim impact panel operated by an IRS-classified 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, which may include online victim impact panels. The maximum fee for enrollment in the DUI victim impact panel shall not exceed seventy-five dollars. An assessment of the extent and nature of the alcohol and drug abuse problem of the applicant must be prepared and a plan of education or treatment, or both, must be developed for the applicant. The Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program shall determine if the applicant successfully has completed the services. The applicant must attend the first Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program available after the date of enrollment. The Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services shall determine the cost of services provided by each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. Each applicant shall bear the cost of services recommended in the applicant's plan of education or treatment. The cost may not exceed five hundred dollars for education services, two thousand dollars for treatment services, and two thousand five hundred dollars in total for all services. An applicant may not be denied services due to an inability to pay. Inability to pay for services may not be used as a factor in determining if the applicant has successfully completed services. An applicant who is unable to pay for services shall perform fifty hours of community service as arranged by the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, which may use the completion of this community service as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. The court must be notified whether an offender failed to enroll in a certified program within thirty days or failed to participate in the plan of education or treatment. The court may hold the individual in contempt of court if the individual cannot show cause as to why no enrollment occurred within the mandated thirty days or why no progress has been made on the plan of education or treatment. SECTION 20. Section 56-5-2933 (C) and (H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The fine for a first offense must not be suspended. The court is prohibited from suspending a monetary fine below that of the next preceding minimum monetary fine. If the trier of fact determines that the person convicted under the provisions of this section did any act forbidden by law or neglected any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately caused a collision that occurred while the person was driving in violation of this section, the court may impose an additional sentence of a fine of not more than four hundred dollars or an additional period of imprisonment of not more than thirty days. However, in lieu of the thirty-day imprisonment, the court may provide for forty-eight hours of public service employment. The public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions the court considers proper. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 23-3-540, 22-3-550, and 14-25-65, this additional sentence may be imposed by the magistrate or municipal court for any offense for which the court would otherwise have jurisdiction. (H) A person convicted of violating this section, whether for a first offense or subsequent offense, must enroll in and successfully complete an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program certified by the Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services and participate and complete a DUI victim impact panel operated by an IRS-classified 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization which may include online victim impact panels. The maximum fee for enrollment in the DUI victim impact panel shall not exceed seventy-five dollars. An assessment of the extent and nature of the alcohol and drug abuse problem of the applicant must be prepared and a plan of education or treatment, or both, must be developed for the applicant. The Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program shall determine if the applicant successfully has completed the services. The applicant must attend the first Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program available after the date of enrollment. The Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services shall determine the cost of services provided by each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. Each applicant shall bear the cost of services recommended in the applicant's plan of education or treatment. The cost may not exceed five hundred dollars for education services, two thousand dollars for treatment services, and two thousand five hundred dollars in total for all services. An applicant may not be denied services due to an inability to pay. Inability to pay for services may not be used as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. An applicant who is unable to pay for services shall perform fifty hours of community service as arranged by the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, which may use the completion of this community service as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. The court must be notified whether an offender failed to enroll in a certified program within thirty days or failed to participate in the plan of education or treatment. The court may hold the individual in contempt of court if the individual cannot show cause as to why no enrollment occurred within the mandated thirty days or why no progress has been made on the plan of education or treatment. SECTION 21. Section 56-5-2945 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2945. (A) A person who, while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or the combination of alcohol and drugs, drives a motor vehicle and when driving a motor vehicle does any act forbidden by law or neglects any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle which act or neglect proximately causes moderate bodily injury to another person is guilty of the offense of felony driving under the influence, second degree, and, upon conviction, must be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than twenty-five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars and imprisoned up to ten years. (B) A person who, while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or the combination of alcohol and drugs, drives a motor vehicle and when driving a motor vehicle does any act forbidden by law or neglects any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately causes great bodily injury or death to another person, is guilty of the offense of felony driving under the influence, first degree, and, upon conviction, must be punished: (1) by a mandatory fine of not less than five thousand one hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand one hundred dollars and mandatory imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than fifteen years when great bodily injury results; (2) by a mandatory fine of not less than ten thousand one hundred dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand one hundred dollars and mandatory imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than twenty-five years when death results. (C) A part of the mandatory sentences required to be imposed by this section must not be suspended, and probation must not be granted for any portion. (B)(D) As used in this section, "great bodily injury" means bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes serious, permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ. As used in this section, "moderate bodily injury" means physical injury that involves prolonged loss of consciousness, or that causes temporary or moderate disfigurement or temporary loss of the function of a bodily member or organ, or injury that requires medical treatment when the treatment requires the use of regional or general anesthesia or injury that results in a fracture or dislocation. Moderate bodily injury does not include a one-time treatment and subsequent observation of scratches, cuts, abrasions, bruises, burns, splinters, or any other injuries that do not ordinarily require extensive medical care. (C)(1)(E)(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the driver's license of a person who is convicted pursuant to this section.  For suspension purposes of this section, convictions arising out of a single incident must run concurrently. (2) After the person is released from prison, the person shall enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941, end the suspension, and obtain an ignition interlock restricted license pursuant to Section 56-1-400. The ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle for: (a) three years when great bodily injury results and five years when a death occurs; or (b) one year when the conviction was for felony driving under the influence, second degree. (D)(F) One hundred dollars of each fine imposed pursuant to this section must be placed by the Comptroller General into a special restricted account to be used by the Department of Public Safety for the Highway Patrol. SECTION 22. Section 56-5-2951(I) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (I)(1) Except as provided in item (3), the period of a driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege suspension for, or denial of issuance of a license or permit to, an arrested person who has no previous convictions for violating Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945, or a law of another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other drugs within the ten years preceding a violation of this section, and who has had no previous suspension imposed pursuant to Section 56-1-286, 56-5-2951, or 56-5-2990, within the ten years preceding a violation of this section is: (a) six months for a person who refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950; or (b) one month three months for a person who takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more. (2) The period of a driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege suspension for, or denial of issuance of a license or permit to, a person who has been convicted previously for violating Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945, or another law of this State or another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or another drug within the ten years preceding a violation of this section, or who has had a previous suspension imposed pursuant to Section 56-1-286, 56-5-2951, or 56-5-2990, within the ten years preceding a violation of this section is: (a) for a second offense, nine monthsone year if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or twosix months if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; (b) for a third offense, twelveeighteen months if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or three nine months if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; and (c) for a fourth or subsequent offense, fifteen monthstwo years if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or four monthsone year if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more. (3)(a) In lieu of serving the remainder of a suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit, a person may enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941, end the suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit, and obtain an ignition interlock restricted license pursuant to Section 56-1-400. The ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle equal to the length of time remaining on the person's suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit. If the length of time remaining is less than three months, the ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle for three months. (b) The person must receive credit for the number of days the person maintained an ignition interlock restriction on the temporary alcohol license. (c) Once a person has enrolled in the Ignition Interlock Device Program and obtained an ignition interlock restricted license, the person is subject to Section 56-5-2941 and cannot subsequently choose to serve the suspension. SECTION 23. The South Carolina Department of Insurance must publish an annual report summarizing liquor liability insurance rate trends, including the number and amount of premium increases, the reasons cited for the increases, and any regulatory actions taken. The annual report must be sent to the Chairman of the House of Representatives Judiciary Committee and Chairman of the Senate Judiciary Committee by January thirtieth of each year. SECTION 24. If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 25. This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----